pt-PT: Acabamento com laço e rebordo em ioiô: Bordo desfiado; Bordo selado a quente; Bordo de renda; Bordo sem arame; Bordo com overloque/remate; Bordo com picô; Bordo com vivo; Bordo com fita ziguezague; Bordo recortado; Bordo com arame; Outro
en: Bow and yo-yo edge finish: Frayed edge; Heat-sealed edge; Lace edge; Non-wired edge; Overlocked/serged edge; Picot edge; Piped edge; Ric-rac edge; Scalloped edge; Wired edge; Other
nl: Bow and yo-yo randafwerking: Gerafelde rand; Gesealde rand; Kanten rand; Niet-bedrade rand; Gelockte rand; Pikotrand; Gepaspeelde rand; Zigzagrand; Geschulpte rand; Bedrade rand; Overige
sk-SK: Mašľová a jojo úprava okrajov: Rozstrapkaný okraj; Tepelne zatavený okraj; Čipkovaný okraj; Okraj bez drôtika; Obnitkovaný/endlovaný okraj; Pikotový okraj; Lemovaný okraj; Okraj s lemovkou; Vlnovkový okraj; Vystužený okraj s drôtikom; Iné
pt-BR: Acabamento com laço e borda em ioiô: Borda desfiada; Borda selada a quente; Borda de renda; Borda sem arame; Borda de overloque; Borda com picô; Borda com debrum; Borda de sianinha; Borda recortada; Borda com arame; Outros
zh-TW: 蝴蝶結和六角折布花邊緣表面處理: 抽鬚邊; 熱封邊; 蕾絲邊; 無鋼圈邊; 拷克邊; 珠邊; 滾邊; 波浪飾邊; 扇形邊; 鋼圈邊; 其他
de: Kantenabschluss von Schleife und Stoffrosette: Ausgefranster Rand; Heißversiegelter Rand; Spitzenrand; Drahtloser Rand; Gekettelter Rand; Pikot-Rand; Paspelrand; Zickzack-Rand; Gewellter Rand; Drahtrand; Sonstige
nb: Sløyfe- og jojokantfinish: Frynset kant; Varmeforseglet kant; Blondekant; Kant uten ståltråd; Overlock-kant; Pikotkant; Bisekant; Sikksakk-kant; Kamskjellkant; Kant med ståltråd; Annet
cs: Povrchová úprava okrajů mašle a ozdobného joja: Roztřepený okraj; Tepelně zatavený okraj; Krajkový okraj; Okraj bez drátku; Overlockový okraj; Pikotkový okraj; Okraj s paspulkou; Okraj s hadovkou; Vroubkovaný okraj; Okraj s drátkem; Jiné
fi: Rusetin ja jojokoristeen reunan viimeistely: Rispaantunut reuna; Kuumasaumattu reuna; Pitsireuna; Rautalangaton reuna; Saumattu/huoliteltu reuna; Nirkkoreuna; Terereuna; Siksak-nauhareuna; Piparkakkureuna; Rautalankareuna; Muu
da: Kantfinish på sløjfe- og yo-yo: Flosset kant; Varmeforseglet kant; Blondekant; Kant uden ståltråd; Overlock-kant; Picotkant; Tittekant; Siksakkant; Bølgekant; Kant med ståltråd; Andet
ko: 활 및 요요 가장자리 마감: 해진 가장자리; 열 밀봉 가장자리; 레이스 가장자리; 와이어 없는 가장자리; 오버로크/서지 처리된 가장자리; 피코트 가장자리; 파이핑 가장자리; 릭랙 가장자리; 스캘럽 가장자리; 와이어 가장자리; 기타
bg-BG: Завършек на ръба при лъкове и йо-йо елементи: Оръфан ръб; Термично запечатан ръб; Дантелен ръб; Ръб без тел; Оверлог ръб; Пико ръб; Обкантен ръб; Зигзаг ръб (рик-рак); Вълнообразен ръб; Ръб с тел; Друго
ja: リボンとヨーヨーエッジ仕上げ: 切りっぱなしエッジ; ヒートシールエッジ; レースエッジ; ノンワイヤーエッジ; オーバーロック/サージエッジ; ピコットエッジ; パイピングエッジ; リックラックエッジ; スカラップエッジ; ワイヤーエッジ; その他
th: การตกแต่งขอบโบว์และโยโย่: ขอบรุ่ย; ขอบซีลความร้อน; ขอบลูกไม้; ขอบไม่มีโครงลวด; ขอบโพ้ง; ขอบปิโกต์; ขอบกุ๊น; ขอบริกแรก; ขอบหยัก; ขอบดัดลวด; อื่นๆ
tr: Fiyonk ve kumaş rozet kenar bitişi: Yıpranmış kenar; Isıyla yapıştırılmış kenar; Dantelli kenar; Telsiz kenar; Overlok kenar; Piko kenar; Biyeli kenar; Sutaşı kenar; Oymalı kenar; Telli kenar; Diğer
lt-LT: Lankelio ir yo-yo krašto apdaila: Spurzuotas kraštas; Karščiu užlydytas kraštas; Nėriniuotas kraštas; Nevieluotas kraštas; Apsiūtas (overlokuotas) kraštas; Kraštas su kilputėmis („Picot“); Apkantuotas kraštas; Vingiuotas kraštas; Banguotas kraštas; Vieluotas kraštas; Kita
zh-CN: 弓和悠悠球边缘处理方式: 毛边; 热封边; 蕾丝边; 无铁丝边; 拷边/锁边; 狗牙边; 嵌线条边; 波浪边; 贝壳边; 带铁丝边; 其他
hr-HR: Završna obrada ruba u obliku mašne i jo-joa: Pohabani rub; Toplinski zapečaćen rub; Čipkasti rub; Rub bez žice; Overlock rub; Rub s pikot bodom; Rub s obrubom (kederom); Cik-cak rub; Nazubljeni rub; Žičani rub; Ostalo
el: Φινίρισμα άκρων δοξαριού και γιο-γιο: Ξεφτισμένο άκρο; Θερμοκολλημένο άκρο; Άκρο με δαντέλα; Άκρο χωρίς σύρμα; Άκρο με καρίκωμα; Άκρο πικό; Άκρο με ρέλι; Άκρο ρικ ρακ; Κυματιστό άκρο; Άκρο με σύρμα; Άλλο
fr: Finition du bord du nœud ou du yo-yo: Bord effiloché; Bord thermoscellé; Bord en dentelle; Bord non armé; Bord surjeté; Bord à picots; Bord passepoilé; Bord croquet; Bord festonné; Bord armé; Autre
vi: Hoàn thiện cạnh cung và yo-yo: Viền tua rua; Viền ép nhiệt; Viền ren; Viền không lõi kẽm; Viền vắt sổ; Viền ren răng cưa; Viền may bọc; Viền zigzag; Viền vỏ sò; Viền có lõi kẽm; Khác
sl-SI: Zaključek z lokom in jojo: Razcefran rob; Toplotno zatesnjen rob; Čipkast rob; Rob brez žice; Overlock rob; Pikot rob; Paspan rob; Cik-cak rob; Valovit rob; Rob z žico; Drugo
ro-RO: Finisaj pe margine arc și yo-yo: Margine franjurată; Margine sigilată termic; Margine de dantelă; Margine fără sârmă; Margine surfilată; Margine cu picot; Margine cu paspoal; Margine ric-rac; Margine festonată; Margine cu sârmă; Altele
es: Acabado de borde del moño o yo-yo: Borde deshilachado; Borde termosellado; Borde de encaje; Borde sin alambre; Borde sobrehilado/remallado; Borde con picot; Borde con ribete; Borde de pasamanería en zigzag; Borde festoneado; Borde con alambre; Otro
sv: Kantfinish på båge och jojo: Fransad kant; Värmeförseglad kant; Spetskant; Kant utan ståltråd; Overlockad kant; Picot-kant; Kant med passpoal; Rickrack-kant; Uddkant; Ståltrådskant; Annan
pl: Wykończenie krawędzi kokardy i jojo: Krawędź strzępiona; Krawędź zgrzewana; Krawędź z koronką; Krawędź bez drutu; Krawędź owerlokowa; Krawędź wykończona pikotką; Krawędź z wypustką; Krawędź ric-rac (zygzak); Muszelkowa krawędź; Krawędź z drutem; Inne
hu: Masni és szövetjojó széleldolgozása: Kopott szél; Hőhegesztett szél; Csipkés szél; Drótozatlan szél; Szegélyezett/tisztázott szél; Pikós szél; Kéderezett szél; Cikcakkszalagos szél; Kagylómintás szél; Drótozott szél; Egyéb
ru: Тип обработки края банта / декоративного элемента йо-йо: Край с бахромой; Термозапаянный край; Кружевной край; Край без проволоки; Обмёточный край; Край пико; Край с кантом; Край с тесьмой вьюнчик; Фестонный край; Край с проволокой; Другое
it: Finitura del bordo a fiocco e yo-yo: Bordo sfrangiato; Bordo termosaldato; Bordo in pizzo; Bordo senza ferretto; Bordo a sopraggitto/tagliacuci; Bordo a picot; Bordo filettato; Bordo a zig-zag (ric-rac); Bordo smerlato; Bordo con filo metallico; Altro